District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.02

Responsibility of District agencies to transfer and refer delinquent debt to the Central Collection Unit for collection.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (a-1) and (a-2) of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, regulation, or Mayor’s order, each District agency shall transfer and refer delinquent debts to the Central Collection Unit within 60 days after a financial obligation owed by a person to the District becomes a delinquent debt.

(a-1)

The University of the District of Columbia shall transfer and refer unpaid student tuition, student fees, and student loans to the Central Collection Unit within one year after the end of the semester in which the student tuition, student fees, and student loans were incurred.

(a-2)

Beginning in fiscal year 2014 and for each fiscal year thereafter, funds collected and recovered by the Central Collection Unit arising out of delinquent debts transferred and referred to the Central Collection Unit by the Not-For-Profit Hospital Corporation for collection, net of costs and fees, shall be deposited into the Not-For-Profit Hospital Corporation Fund by the Central Collection Unit within 60 days following the then current fiscal year.

(b)

A transfer and referral of a delinquent debt to the Central Collection Unit shall include all documentation and information relating to the delinquent debt, including:

(1)

Documents that verify the existence and amount of the delinquent debt; (2) The name and last known address of the delinquent debtor; and

(3)

Any notices issued to the delinquent debtor demanding payment.

(c)

The procedure for transfer and referral of delinquent debt by each District agency to the Central Collection Unit, including the format and means of delivery of the information, shall be established by the Central Collection Unit within 120 days of September 20, 2012.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1043, 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7032(a), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-350.04.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added “Except as provided in subsections (a-1) and (a-2) of this section” in (a); and added (a-1) and (a-2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7032(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7032(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Delinquent Debt Recovery Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.